Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3532
Nebraska Emergency Management Agency Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Nebraska Emergency Management Agency Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the director of the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency. The fund shall consist of all non-federal-fund revenue received by the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency. The fund shall only be used to pay for eligible costs of the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2006, LB 787, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB322, § 18.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.